Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska23-1805
Inquest; juror; refusal to serve; penalty.

Whoever, being so summoned as a juror, fails or refuses, without good cause, to attend at the time and place required, or, appearing, refuses to act as such juror, or misbehaves while acting as such juror, shall, on complaint of the coroner before the county court, be fined not less than three nor more than twenty dollars.

Laws 1879, § 101, p. 381;

R.S.1913, § 5667;

C.S.1922, § 4997;

C.S.1929, § 26-1506;

R.S.1943, § 23-1805;

Laws 1972, LB 1032, § 113.